Utah statutes.
63M-8-203.   Qualifications of members.

(1)  Members appointed to the commission shall have the following qualifications:

(a)  a demonstrated record of leadership and involvement; and

(b)  a willingness to make a commitment to the furtherance of the purposes of the commission. 

(2)  The commission may make recommendations to the governor concerning appointment of members.

